GRAMMARS/ITALIAN/FST2/src/lex-cities.lexc
!# ============================================================================
!# TYPE:	lexc
!# ENCODING:	UTF-8
!# CONTENT:     country capitals
!# 
!# LANGUAGE:    ITALIAN
!#
!# AUTHOR:      A. Schiller, G. Depau
!#
!# CREATED:	02-July-2008
!#
!# ============================================================================
!# sources:
!# [E] http://publications.europa.eu/code/it/it-5000500.htm
!# [W] Wikipedia
!# ============================================================================
Multichar_Symbols

 +Prop +Adj +NAdj
+Demonym

+City

+Continent

+Place

+Sg +Pl
+Masc +Fem

! special markers
(.)	! optional dot
(-)	! optional hyphen
[-]	! hyphen or space


!# continuation classes
LEXICON	MSG	+Masc+Sg	#;
LEXICON	FSG	+Fem+Sg		#;
LEXICON	MPL	+Masc+Pl	#;
LEXICON	FPL	+Fem+Pl		#;

LEXICON MSGPL	MSG; MPL;
LEXICON FSGPL	FSG; FPL;
LEXICON MFSGPL	MSGPL; FSGPL;

LEXICON ROOT 
Bissau+Prop+City			FSG;		!# Guinea-Bissau
Dili+Prop+City			FSG;		!# Timor Est
L'Avana+Prop+City			FSG;		!# Cuba
Muscat+Prop+City			FSG;		!# Oman
Pretoria+Prop+City			FSG;		!# Sudafrica (amministrativa)	
Suva+Prop+City			FSG;		!# Figi
Hargeisa+Prop+City			FSG;		!# Somaliland
Dar% es% Salaam+Prop+City		FSG;		!# Tanzania
Maracaibo+Prop+City		FSG;		!# Venezuela
Tientsin+Prop+City			FSG;		!# Cina
Malaga+Prop+City			FSG;
Acceglio+Prop+City		FSG;
Acquaviva% Picena+Prop+City		FSG;
Aglientu+Prop+City		FSG;
Airasca+Prop+City		FSG;
Albaredo% d'Adige+Prop+City		FSG;
Albuquerque+Prop+City		FSG;
Alliste+Prop+City		FSG;
Altopascio+Prop+City		FSG;
Ancarano+Prop+City		FSG;
Anshan+Prop+City		FSG;
Appiano% sulla% Strada% del% Vino+Prop+City		FSG;
Arcisate+Prop+City		FSG;
Arielli+Prop+City		FSG;
Arsago% Seprio+Prop+City		FSG;
Assemini+Prop+City		FSG;
Ausonia+Prop+City		FSG;
Azzio+Prop+City		FSG;
Bagnolo% Cremasco+Prop+City		FSG;
Balsorano+Prop+City		FSG;
Barbiano+Prop+City		FSG;
Barone% Canavese+Prop+City		FSG;
Bastida% Pancarana+Prop+City		FSG;
Belforte% Monferrato+Prop+City		FSG;
Belvedere% Langhe+Prop+City		FSG;
Bernalda+Prop+City		FSG;
Bevagna+Prop+City		FSG;
Bioglio+Prop+City		FSG;
Bobbio+Prop+City		FSG;
Bolzano% Vicentino+Prop+City		FSG;
Bordolano+Prop+City		FSG;
Borgonovo+Prop+City		FSG;
Borriana+Prop+City		FSG;
Boville% Ernica+Prop+City		FSG;
Brembilla+Prop+City		FSG;
Briga% Novarese+Prop+City		FSG;
Brovello-Carpugnino+Prop+City		FSG;
Budoia+Prop+City		FSG;
Busano+Prop+City		FSG;
Cadenabbia+Prop+City		FSG;
Calamandrana+Prop+City		FSG;
Calendasco+Prop+City		FSG;
Calvi% dell'Umbria+Prop+City		FSG;
Cammarata+Prop+City		FSG;
Campobello% di% Mazara+Prop+City		FSG;
Campolongo% sul% Brenta+Prop+City		FSG;
Candelo+Prop+City		FSG;
Canonica+Prop+City		FSG;
Capiago-Intimiano+Prop+City		FSG;
Capranica+Prop+City		FSG;
Caramagna+Prop+City		FSG;
Cardito+Prop+City		FSG;
Carnate+Prop+City		FSG;
Carrara% San% Giorgio+Prop+City		FSG;
Casalborgone+Prop+City		FSG;
Casalmorano+Prop+City		FSG;
Casapulla+Prop+City		FSG;
Caslino% d'Erba+Prop+City		FSG;
Cassaro+Prop+City		FSG;
Castelbello% Ciardes+Prop+City		FSG;
Castel% di% Tora+Prop+City		FSG;
Castellana+Prop+City		FSG;
Castellino% del% Biferno+Prop+City		FSG;
Castelmauro+Prop+City		FSG;
Castelnuovo% Val% di% Cecina+Prop+City		FSG;
Castelvecchio+Prop+City		FSG;
Castiglione% Messer% Marino+Prop+City		FSG;
Castronuovo% di% Sant'Andrea+Prop+City		FSG;
Cavargna+Prop+City		FSG;
Cefalà% Diana+Prop+City		FSG;
Cellino% San% Marco+Prop+City		FSG;
Cercino+Prop+City		FSG;
Cerreto% Castello+Prop+City		FSG;
Cerveteri+Prop+City		FSG;
Ceto+Prop+City		FSG;
Chiaravalle% di% Fiastra+Prop+City		FSG;
Chiuro+Prop+City		FSG;
Cigognola+Prop+City		FSG;
Cirimido+Prop+City		FSG;
Cividale% del% Friuli+Prop+City		FSG;
Cleto+Prop+City		FSG;
Colazza+Prop+City		FSG;
Collepietro+Prop+City		FSG;
Colonia+Prop+City		FSG;
Conca% della% Campania+Prop+City		FSG;
Conversano+Prop+City		FSG;
Corinto+Prop+City		FSG;
Corropoli+Prop+City		FSG;
Corzano+Prop+City		FSG;
Costa% Volpino+Prop+City		FSG;
Crespano% del% Grappa+Prop+City		FSG;
Cuccurano+Prop+City		FSG;
Cursi+Prop+City		FSG;
Davoli+Prop+City		FSG;
Diamante+Prop+City		FSG;
Domicella+Prop+City		FSG;
Drena+Prop+City		FSG;
Edimburgo+Prop+City		FSG;
Ercolano+Prop+City		FSG;
Faeto+Prop+City		FSG;
Fara% Novarese+Prop+City		FSG;
Felino+Prop+City		FSG;
Fiano% Romano+Prop+City		FSG;
Finale% Emilia+Prop+City		FSG;
Floresta+Prop+City		FSG;
Fontana+Prop+City		FSG;
Forlì% del% Sannio+Prop+City		FSG;
Fossa+Prop+City		FSG;
Frankfurt% am% Main+Prop+City		FSG;
Frignano+Prop+City		FSG;
Gadoni+Prop+City		FSG;
Gallicano% nel% Lazio+Prop+City		FSG;
Garbagnate% Milanese+Prop+City		FSG;
Gavorrano+Prop+City		FSG;
Gergei+Prop+City		FSG;
Giarratana+Prop+City		FSG;
Giove+Prop+City		FSG;
Godega% Sant'Urbano+Prop+City		FSG;
Gorla% Minore+Prop+City		FSG;
Granarolo+Prop+City		FSG;
Grenoble+Prop+City		FSG;
Grosso+Prop+City		FSG;
Guarcino+Prop+City		FSG;
Haarlem+Prop+City		FSG;
Imer+Prop+City		FSG;
Irkutsk+Prop+City		FSG;
Isola% Rizza+Prop+City		FSG;
Joppolo% Giancaxio+Prop+City		FSG;
Kowloon+Prop+City		FSG;
Lago+Prop+City		FSG;
Lana+Prop+City		FSG;
Las% Plassas+Prop+City		FSG;
Lavena+Prop+City		FSG;
Lenta+Prop+City		FSG;
Leverano+Prop+City		FSG;
Limido% Comasco+Prop+City		FSG;
Livorno+Prop+City		FSG;
Lona+Prop+City		FSG;
Lorsica+Prop+City		FSG;
Lugo% di% Vicenza+Prop+City		FSG;
Lusiglie+Prop+City		FSG;
Madone+Prop+City		FSG;
Magomadas+Prop+City		FSG;
Malines+Prop+City		FSG;
Mangone+Prop+City		FSG;
Marcellinara+Prop+City		FSG;
Marina% di% Pietrasanta+Prop+City		FSG;
Martina% Franca+Prop+City		FSG;
Mason% Vicentino+Prop+City		FSG;
Mayotte+Prop+City		FSG;
Meldola+Prop+City		FSG;
Menfi+Prop+City		FSG;
Metaponto+Prop+City		FSG;
Migliarino+Prop+City		FSG;
Mirabello+Prop+City		FSG;
Mogliano+Prop+City		FSG;
Mombaldone+Prop+City		FSG;
Moncestino+Prop+City		FSG;
Monopoli+Prop+City		FSG;
Montalenghe+Prop+City		FSG;
Montebelluna+Prop+City		FSG;
Montecorice+Prop+City		FSG;
Montefranco+Prop+City		FSG;
Monteleone% Sabino+Prop+City		FSG;
Montenero+Prop+City		FSG;
Monterotondo+Prop+City		FSG;
Monte% Urano+Prop+City		FSG;
Montoggio+Prop+City		FSG;
Morciano+Prop+City		FSG;
Morrone% del% Sannio+Prop+City		FSG;
Mozzate+Prop+City		FSG;
Mussolente+Prop+City		FSG;
Nazzano+Prop+City		FSG;
Nicorvo+Prop+City		FSG;
Nola+Prop+City		FSG;
Novedrate+Prop+City		FSG;
Nuxis+Prop+City		FSG;
Oleggio% Castello+Prop+City		FSG;
Oltrona% San% Mamette+Prop+City		FSG;
Orentano+Prop+City		FSG;
Orsomarso+Prop+City		FSG;
Osini+Prop+City		FSG;
Ottati+Prop+City		FSG;
Paderno% Dugnano+Prop+City		FSG;
Palata+Prop+City		FSG;
Palmoli+Prop+City		FSG;
Paraná+Prop+City		FSG;
Pastena+Prop+City		FSG;
Pecetto+Prop+City		FSG;
Penna% San% Giovanni+Prop+City		FSG;
Perrero+Prop+City		FSG;
Pessina% Cremonese+Prop+City		FSG;
Piadena+Prop+City		FSG;
Piasco+Prop+City		FSG;
Pietra% de'% Giorgi+Prop+City		FSG;
Pieve% di% Ledro+Prop+City		FSG;
Pino% Lago% Maggiore+Prop+City		FSG;
Piteglio+Prop+City		FSG;
Poggio% Berni+Prop+City		FSG;
Polesine+Prop+City		FSG;
Pomezia+Prop+City		FSG;
Ponte% in% Valtellina+Prop+City		FSG;
Ponzano% Romano+Prop+City		FSG;
Porto% Empedocle+Prop+City		FSG;
Postiglione+Prop+City		FSG;
Pradamano+Prop+City		FSG;
Pratola% Peligna+Prop+City		FSG;
Preseglie+Prop+City		FSG;
Prunetto+Prop+City		FSG;
Quattordio+Prop+City		FSG;
Raiano+Prop+City		FSG;
Reana% del% Roiale+Prop+City		FSG;
Resia+Prop+City		FSG;
Riccione+Prop+City		FSG;
Rionero+Prop+City		FSG;
Riva+Prop+City		FSG;
Robecco% Pavese+Prop+City		FSG;
Roccaforte+Prop+City		FSG;
Roccascalegna+Prop+City		FSG;
Rodeneck+Prop+City		FSG;
Romans% d'Isonzo+Prop+City		FSG;
Ronzo-Chienis+Prop+City		FSG;
Rossignol+Prop+City		FSG;
Rovetta+Prop+City		FSG;
Sacramento+Prop+City		FSG;
Sala% Consilina+Prop+City		FSG;
Salisbury+Prop+City		FSG;
Sambuca+Prop+City		FSG;
San% Biagio% della% Cima+Prop+City		FSG;
San% Clemente% al% Vomano+Prop+City		FSG;
San% Donato% di% Lecce+Prop+City		FSG;
Sangano+Prop+City		FSG;
San% Giorgio% di% Nogaro+Prop+City		FSG;
San% Giovanni% Lupatoto+Prop+City		FSG;
San% Lorenzo% di% Mossa+Prop+City		FSG;
San% Martino% d'Agri+Prop+City		FSG;
San% Nicolò% d'Arcidano+Prop+City		FSG;
Sanremo+Prop+City		FSG;
Sant'Agata% de'% Goti+Prop+City		FSG;
Sant'Anatolia% di% Narco+Prop+City		FSG;
Sant'Elena% Sannita+Prop+City		FSG;
San% Vincenzo+Prop+City		FSG;
Sassari+Prop+City		FSG;
Scena+Prop+City		FSG;
Selva% del% Molini+Prop+City		FSG;
Serrastretta+Prop+City		FSG;
Sidone+Prop+City		FSG;
Solero+Prop+City		FSG;
Soveria% Simeri+Prop+City		FSG;
Staranzano+Prop+City		FSG;
Sueglio+Prop+City		FSG;
Tartu+Prop+City		FSG;
Terracina+Prop+City		FSG;
Tisens+Prop+City		FSG;
Torrazza+Prop+City		FSG;
Tortorella+Prop+City		FSG;
Trenzano+Prop+City		FSG;
Trondheim+Prop+City		FSG;
Urgnano+Prop+City		FSG;
Valenzano+Prop+City		FSG;
Valmorea+Prop+City		FSG;
Vedano+Prop+City		FSG;
Veronella+Prop+City		FSG;
Vidigulfo+Prop+City		FSG;
Villa% d'Ogna+Prop+City		FSG;
Villarboit+Prop+City		FSG;
Vistarino+Prop+City		FSG;
Winterthur+Prop+City		FSG;
Zuglio+Prop+City		FSG;
